Alabama, session 2026rs, HB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-5-46.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
(a) A defendant convicted of a capital offense who was
sentenced pursuant to this article prior to June 1, 2026, on
petition to the sentencing court, shall be resentenced
pursuant to Section 13A-5-46, if the court finds all of the
following:
(1) The defendant was sentenced pursuant to the
provisions of this article prior to June 1, 2026, under the
law in effect on April 10, 2017.
(2) The jury returned an advisory verdict recommending
to the trial court that the imposed penalty be life
imprisonment without parole.
(3) The sentencing court overruled the jury's advisory
verdict and imposed a sentence of death.
(b) The petition shall be on a form and in a manner
established by the Administrative Office of Courts. Petitions
shall be considered authorized motions for modifications of
sentence, shall be assigned a unique identifier by the
Administrative Office of Courts, and shall not require payment
of a filing fee.
(c) The petition for resentencing shall be heard by the
Page 2

(c) The petition for resentencing shall be heard by the
HB70 INTRODUCED
original sentencing judge or his or her successor, the
presiding judge of the circuit, or a retired judge as assigned
by the Chief Justice of the Alabama Supreme Court. If the
court determines the defendant is eligible for resentencing
pursuant subsection (a), the court shall order the defendant
to be resentenced. The court shall dismiss the petition if the
court determines the defendant to be ineligible.
(d) The court shall serve a copy of the petition for
resentencing on the district attorney in the county of the
conviction. The district attorney shall have an opportunity to
be heard on any motion filed pursuant to this section.
(e) Upon determining the defendant is eligible for
resentencing pursuant to subsection (a), the court shall
notify the Victim Notification Unit of the Board of Pardons
and Paroles, which shall provide notifications to any
interested party registered for notice for the inmate through
the statewide automated victim notification system established
pursuant to Section 15-22-36.2.
(f) The Administrative Office of Courts shall adopt
rules to implement and administer this section.
Section 2. Section 13A-5-47.1, Code of Alabama 1975,
relating to the application of sentencing of certain
defendants convicted of capital murder, is repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3